Hawaii statutes.
§302D-18 Renewals, revocations, and
nonrenewals. (a) A charter contract may be renewed for successive
five-year terms of duration, although an authorizer may vary the terms based on
performance, demonstrated capacities, and particular circumstances of each
charter school. An authorizer may grant a renewal of a charter contract with
specific conditions for necessary improvements to a charter school.

(b) The authorizer shall issue a charter
school performance report and charter contract renewal application guidance to
any charter school whose charter contract is in its final contract year. The
performance report shall summarize the charter school's performance record to
date, based on the data required by this chapter and the charter contract, and
shall provide notice of any weaknesses or concerns perceived by the authorizer
concerning the charter school that may jeopardize its position in seeking
renewal.

(c) The renewal application guidance shall, at
a minimum, provide an opportunity for the public charter school to:

(1) Submit any corrections or clarifications to the
performance report;

(2) Present additional evidence, beyond the data
contained in the performance report, supporting its case for charter renewal;

(3) Describe improvements undertaken or planned for
the school; and

(4) Detail the charter school's plans for the next
charter term.

(d) The renewal application guidance shall
include or refer explicitly to the criteria that will guide the authorizer's
renewal decisions, which shall be based on the charter contract and be
consistent with this chapter.

(e) No later than thirty days after the
issuance of the performance report, the governing board of a charter school
seeking renewal shall submit a renewal application to the authorizer pursuant
to the renewal guidance issued by the authorizer. The authorizer shall decide
whether or not to renew the charter no later than forty-five days after the
filing of the renewal application.

(f) In making charter renewal decisions, every
authorizer shall:

(1) Ground its decisions in evidence of the school's
performance over the term of the charter contract in accordance with the
performance framework set forth in the charter contract;

(2) Ensure that data used in making the renewal
decisions are available to the charter school and the public; and

(3) Provide a public report summarizing the evidence
and basis for each decision.

(g) A charter contract may be revoked at any
time or not renewed if the authorizer determines that the charter school did
any of the following or otherwise failed to comply with the provisions of this
chapter:

(1) Committed a material and substantial violation of
any of the terms, conditions, standards, or procedures required under this
chapter or the charter contract;

(2) Failed to meet or make sufficient progress toward
performance expectations set forth in the contract;

(3) Failed to meet generally accepted standards of
fiscal management; or

(4) Substantially violated any material provision of
law from which the charter school is not exempted.

(h) An authorizer shall develop revocation and
nonrenewal processes that:

(1) Provide charter contract holders with a timely
notification of the prospect of revocation or non-renewal and the reasons for
such possible closure;

(2) Allow charter contract holders a reasonable
amount of time in which to prepare a response;

(3) Provide charter contract holders with an
opportunity to submit documents and give testimony challenging the rationale
for closure and supporting the continuation of the school at an orderly
proceeding held for that purpose; provided that the proceeding shall be
governed by the requirements set forth in this section and shall not be
additionally subject to the requirements for an agency hearing under chapter 91;

(4) Allow charter contract holders access to
representation by counsel, subject to section 28-8.3, and to call witnesses on
their behalf;

(5) Permit the recording of proceedings described in
paragraph (3); and

(6) After a reasonable period for deliberation,
require a final determination to be made and conveyed in writing to the charter
contract holders.

(i) If an authorizer revokes or does not renew
a charter contract, the authorizer shall clearly state in writing the reasons
for the revocation or nonrenewal.

(j) Within fifteen days of taking action to
renew, not to renew, or to revoke a charter contract, the authorizer shall
report to the board the action taken, and shall simultaneously provide a copy
of the report to the charter school. The report shall set forth the action
taken and reasons for the decision and assurances as to compliance with all the
requirements set forth in this chapter. [L 2012, c 130, pt of §2; am L 2013, c
159, §12; am L 2014, c 99, §13; am L 2016, c 113, §4]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next